ja: 入れ歯のデザイン: フレキシブル; 即時; オーバーデンチャー; その他
es: Diseño de dentadura postiza: Flexible; Inmediato; Sobredentadura; Otros
hu: Fogsor kialakítása: Rugalmas; Közvetlen; Overdenture; Egyéb
en: Denture design: Flexible; Immediate; Overdenture; Other
hr-HR: Dizajn zubne proteze: Fleksibilno; Trenutno; Proteza; Ostalo
da: Protesedesign: Fleksibel; Immediat; Overprotese; Andet
pl: Konstrukcja protezy: Elastyczne; Natychmiastowa; Overdenture; Inne
it: Progettazione di protesi: Flessibile; Immediato; Overdenture; Altro
zh-TW: 假牙設計: 柔韌; 即時; 覆蓋義齒; 其他
ro-RO: Design proteză: Flexibilă; Imediată; Supraproteză; Altele
fi: Hammasproteesin suunnittelu: Joustava; Välitön; Päällysproteesi; Muu
ko: 의치 디자인: 유연함; 즉각적인; 중첩의치; 기타
sv: Design på protes: Flexibel; Omedelbar; Överprotes; Övrigt
sk-SK: Dizajn zubnej protézy: Flexibilný; Okamžitý; Prekrytie zubnej protézy; Iné
vi: Thiết kế răng giả: Mềm dẻo; Tức thì; Làm răng giả; Khác
fr: Couverture de la prothèse dentaire: Flexible; Immédiat; Prothèse dentaire; Autre
tr: Protez tasarımı: Esnek; Hemen; Diş üstü protez; Diğer
bg-BG: Дизайн на зъбните протези: Гъвкав; Незабавен; Надзъбна протеза; Други
nb: Protesedesign: Fleksibel; Umiddelbar; Overprotese; Annet
zh-CN: 义齿设计: 灵活式; 即刻义齿; 覆盖义齿; 其他
th: การออกแบบฟันปลอม: ขอบยืดหยุ่น; แบบทันที; ฟันปลอมถอดได้; อื่นๆ
de: Zahnersatz-Design: Flexibel; Sofort; Deckprothese; Sonstiges
nl: Ontwerp kunstgebit: Flexibel; Direct; Overkappingsprothese; Andere
pt-BR: Design de prótese dentária: Flexível; Imediato; Sobredentadura; Outro
pt-PT: Design de prótese: Flexível; Imediato; Sobredentadura; Outro
sl-SI: Zasnova zobne proteze: Prilagodljivo; Takojšnja; Nadomestna proteza; Drugo
ru: Тип зубного протеза: Гибкий; Мгновенный; Съемный протез; Другой
lt-LT: Dantų protezo konstrukcija: Lankstūs; Laikini; Fiksuojami ant implantų; Kita
cs: Design zubní protézy: Pružná; Bezprostřední; Předzubní protéza; Jiné
el: Σχέδιο οδοντοστοιχίας: Εύκαμπτο; Άμεση; Επένθετη οδοντοστοιχία; Άλλο